New York, session 2025-2026, S3620.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 23 of the town law is amended by adding a new 2 subdivision 37 to read as follows: 3 37. Notwithstanding subdivision one of this section, in the town of 4 Pendleton, Niagara county, the person performing the function of build- 5 ing inspector need not be an elector of such town. Provided, however, 6 the person performing the function of building inspector in any other 7 town shall be an elector of such town, unless otherwise provided by an 8 act of the state legislature. 9 § 2. Section 3 of the public officers law is amended by adding a new 10 subdivision 76 to read as follows: 11 76. In the town of Pendleton, Niagara county, the provisions of this 12 section requiring a person to be a resident of the political subdivision 13 or municipal corporation of the state for which they shall be chosen, or 14 within which their official function is required to be exercised, shall 15 not prevent a person from holding the office of building inspector of 16 the town of Pendleton, Niagara county; provided that said person resides 17 in the county in which such town is located or an adjoining county with- 18 in the state of New York. Provided, however, the person performing the 19 functions of building inspector in any other town shall be a resident of 20 such town, unless otherwise provided by law. 21 § 3. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD05908-01-5